Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2811
Approval of formation of municipal county; effect.

Approval of the formation of a municipal county shall abolish all county and municipal offices at the end of the then current officeholders' terms except as provided in subsection (3) of section 13-2803 and shall terminate all townships located within the municipal county. All debt of abolished counties and municipalities consolidated into a municipal county shall remain the responsibility of the county or municipality responsible at the time consolidation is approved.

Laws 2001, LB 142, § 11.